Massachusetts, session 194th, S531.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44A of chapter 43 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended, in line 7, by inserting after the word “inclusive,” the
following words:- and section 103R of chapter 54.
SECTION 2. Section 77 of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the phrase “marking a cross (X) in the square
at the right of the name of each candidate for whom he intends to vote” and inserting in place
thereof the following phrase:- marking the ballot in a manner prescribed by the state secretary.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting
after section 103Q the following section:-
of 3

Section 103R. (a) Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, in any
city or town that accepts this section, a local election may be conducted using ranked choice
voting in which voters rank the candidates for an office in order of preference. Ranked choice
voting elections may be used for elections with a single winning candidate or multiple winning
candidates. Ranked choice voting elections shall be tabulated in rounds using the single
transferable vote method. Winning thresholds shall be calculated based on the number of
countable votes and the number of seats to be filled.
General provisions for a single-winner election and a multiple-winner election shall be
specified by ordinance or by-law; provided, however, that a voter’s lower ranked choice shall not
impact the likelihood of a voter’s higher ranked choice of being elected. The ordinance or by-law
shall be enacted by the municipality’s legislative body and the body shall request the input of the
registrar of voters and town clerk or city election commissioners. The ordinance shall specify, at
a minimum: (i) the method of calculating the winning threshold; (ii) how candidates with the
fewest votes shall be eliminated before a subsequent round of the tally; (iii) how a vote for
eliminated candidates shall be transferred to the voter's next valid choice; (iv) how a tie shall be
resolved; (v) how a ballot that skipped a ranking or is otherwise mismarked shall be counted; and
(vi) how a vote above the winning threshold for a candidate shall be transferred to an alternate
choices in a multiple-winner election. Preliminary elections for local offices shall not be held in a
city or town that has accepted this section.
(b) This section may be accepted by: (i) approval of a ballot measure submitted to the
voters by the governing body of the city or town at a regular or special election; (ii) ordinance or
by-law; or (iii) charter amendment.
of 3

(c) A city or town that accepts this section shall conduct a voter education and outreach
campaign to familiarize voters with ranked choice voting.
(d) The ballot shall not interfere with a voter's ability to rank at least 1 write-in candidate.
(e) Not sooner than 4 years after acceptance of this section, a city or town that has
accepted this section may return to its prior voting method by: (i) approval of a ballot measure
submitted to the voters by the governing body of the city or town at a regular or special election;
(ii) ordinance or by-law; or (iii) charter amendment.
of 3